District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-734

Limitations on use of land.

Repealed.

History

R.S., D.C., § 456
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(p), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-734.
1981 Ed., § 29-916.
1973 Ed., § 29-516.